Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
CHAPTER 48 Budget

48.005.
Public accountability for funds or assets recovered by duly elected statewide
constitutional officers through judgment or settlement — Applicability of Open
Records and Open Meetings Laws — Administration and disbursement of trust
funds or assets by Office of the Controller — Exceptions — Costs of litigation — Limitation regarding constitutional challenge.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Public accountability for funds or other assets recovered in a legal action by or on behalf of the general public, the Commonwealth, or its duly elected statewide constitutional officers is appropriate and required, whether the character of the assets or funds recovered is public or private;

Accountability for assets or funds recovered by duly elected statewide constitutional officers is essential to the public trust, and is even more critical when that officer was a party to the action that resulted in the recovery by virtue of the public office he or she holds;

Public accountability demands the applicability of the Kentucky Model Procurement Code, KRS Chapter 45A, Kentucky Open Records Law, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, and the Kentucky Open Meetings Law, KRS

61.805

to

61.850

, so that the actions of individuals or agencies who are charged with the administration of funds or other assets are conducted in full view, and are open to public scrutiny; and

The power to appropriate funds for public purposes is solely within the purview of the legislative branch of government, and the General Assembly, as a steward of the budgetary process, shall take steps to assure that future settlements are handled in a manner that assures maximum accountability to the citizens of the Commonwealth and their duly elected legislative representatives.

Therefore, any other provision of the common law or statutory law to the contrary notwithstanding:

The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall apply whenever the Attorney General or other duly elected statewide constitutional officer is a party or has entered his appearance in a legal action on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, including ex rel. or other type actions, and a disposition of that action has resulted in the recovery of funds or assets to be held in trust by the Attorney General or other duly elected statewide constitutional officer or a person, organization, or entity created by the Attorney General or the Commonwealth, through court action or otherwise, to administer the trust funds or assets, for charitable, eleemosynary, benevolent, educational, or similar public purposes;

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall apply when any funds or assets of any kind or nature whatsoever, including but not limited to public funds as defined in KRS

446.010

and private funds or assets are recovered by judgment or settlement of a legal action by or on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, including ex rel. or other type actions filed by a duly elected statewide constitutional officer under that officer’s statutory or common law authority.

Whenever the Attorney General or other duly elected statewide constitutional officer is a party to or has entered his appearance in, a legal action on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, including ex rel. or other type actions, and a disposition of that action has resulted in the recovery of funds or assets to be held in trust by the Attorney General or other duly elected statewide constitutional officer or by a person, organization, or entity created by the Attorney General, or the Commonwealth, through court action or otherwise, to administer the trust funds or assets, for charitable, eleemosynary, benevolent, educational, or similar public purposes, those funds shall be deposited in the State Treasury and the funds or assets administered and disbursed by the Office of the Controller.

The Office of Attorney General may first recover its reasonable costs of litigation, as determined by the court and approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. After recovering the reasonable costs of litigation, any required consumer restitution or payments shall be made. All remaining funds shall be deposited in the general fund surplus account. Any costs recovered under this subsection shall be reported to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

The common law, including the common law authority of any duly elected statewide constitutional officer, is specifically abrogated to the extent it is inconsistent with the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding any statute or common law to the contrary, and except as provided in this subsection, an elected statewide constitutional officer or any other state official or agency shall not file or participate as a plaintiff, petitioner, party, intervening party, attorney, or amicus curiae in any litigation challenging the constitutionality of this section. State funds and employee time shall not be expended by any person or agency in support of such a challenge. If the constitutionality of this section is challenged, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be the sole named respondent in that litigation, and shall consult with the Legislative Research Commission regarding defense of that litigation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 483, § 1, effective April 21, 2000; 2009, ch. 12, § 29, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 110, § 9, effective April 11, 2012; 2018 ch. 87, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 1, (1) at 1682.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Frost, Financing Public Health Through Nonprofit Conversion Foundations, 90 Ky. L.J. 935 (2001-02).

48.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Account” is a technical accounting term meaning a formal record in which related transactions and events, (i.e., expenditures, receipts, encumbrances, and inter-account charges or credits) which occur during a specific period of time, are summarized and accumulated;

“Activities” means those actions or services performed by a budget unit which depict in a quantitative manner the fulfillment of lawful purposes;

Appropriation-related terms are defined for procedures prescribed by this chapter as follows:

“Appropriation” means an authorization by the General Assembly to expend a sum of money not in excess of the sum specified, for the purposes specified in the authorization and under the procedure prescribed in this chapter;

“Appropriation provision” means a section of any enactment by the General Assembly which is not provided for by this chapter and which authorizes the expenditure of funds other than by a general appropriation bill; and

“General appropriation bill” means an enactment by the General Assembly that authorizes the expenditure of funds in a branch budget bill as provided for by this chapter;

“Biennial highway construction plan” means the specifically identified individual transportation projects or portions thereof identified for funding during the upcoming biennium, which correspond to the first two (2) years of the six (6) year road plan;

“Budget” means the complete financial plan for each fiscal year contained in a branch budget bill provided for by this chapter;

“Branch budget bill” or “branch budget” means an enactment by the General Assembly which provides appropriations and establishes fiscal policies and conditions for the biennial financial plan for the judicial branch, the legislative branch, and the executive branch, which shall include a separate budget bill for the Transportation Cabinet;

“Branch budget recommendation” means the recommendations made to the General Assembly by:

The Governor for the executive branch, including a separate recommendation for the Transportation Cabinet;

The Chief Justice for the judicial branch; and

The Legislative Research Commission for the legislative branch;

“Budget unit request” means a detailed statement of the financial requirements of a budget unit by principal budget class, and an estimate of its receipts and expenditures for the next two (2) fiscal years, with the accompanying explanations provided for by this chapter;

“Budget unit” or “appropriation unit” means any subdivision of any branch of government, however designated in any branch budget bill;

“Capital outlay” means the exchange of values involved in acquiring lands, buildings, equipment, or other permanent properties, or in their construction, development, or permanent improvement;

“Consensus forecasting group” means the group established by KRS

48.115

that is responsible for developing consensus revenue forecasts for the Commonwealth;

“Disbursement” means cash actually paid out for any purpose;

“Enacted estimates” means the revenue estimates used by the General Assembly as the basis for appropriations made in the enacted branch budget bills;

“Expenditure” means cash actually paid out or an exchange of value for any purpose;

“Fund” means an independent fiscal and accounting entity with a self-balancing set of accounts recording cash or other resources or both together with all related liabilities, obligations, reserves, and equities which are segregated for the purpose of carrying on specific activities in accordance with legal restrictions or other limitations, to include:

“General Fund.” This fund shall consist of all moneys, not otherwise restricted, available for the general operations of state government;

“Bond Debt Related Fund.” This fund shall consist of all outstanding bonded debt liability and related funds of state government, including all revenue bonds issued by or approved by the State Property and Buildings Commission. Accounts necessary to assure integrity of trust indentures shall be maintained. Funds appropriated for debt service shall be allotted to these accounts and any excess of appropriation over net requirements for principal, interest, and reserves for any issue shall lapse to the surplus account of the general fund if general funds are a part of the appropriation for that budget unit;

“Capital Construction Fund.” This fund shall consist of moneys appropriated under the provision of KRS

45.750

to

45.800

for capital construction projects, except road construction projects, for all budget units of state government;

“Federal Fund.” This fund shall include all receipts from the federal government for any purpose;

“Fiduciary Fund.” This fund shall consist of moneys held by a budget unit in a trustee capacity;

“Restricted Fund.” This fund shall consist of budget unit receipts restricted as to purpose by statute; and

“Road Fund.” This fund shall consist of money derived from excise or license taxation relating to gasoline and other motor fuels, and moneys derived from fees, excise or license taxation relating to registration, operation, or use of vehicles for use on public highways. A separate record of each source of receipt within this fund group shall be maintained;

“Principal budget class” includes the following:

“Capital outlay” means the exchange of values involved in acquiring lands, buildings, or other permanent properties, or in their construction, development, or permanent improvement estimated to cost less than six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000), and items of equipment or other capital items estimated to cost less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000);

“Debt service” means the amount of money required to pay the interest, principal, and required contributions to accumulate moneys for future retirement of lawfully incurred debt;

“Grants, loans, or benefits” means expenditures for any grant, aid, loan, or relief payment to individuals, organizations, or jurisdictions not otherwise classified pursuant to this chapter;

“Operating expenses” means expenditures directly attributable to the operation of state government not otherwise classified pursuant to this chapter; and

“Personnel costs” means the salaries, wages, benefits (including but not limited to, employer share of FICA, retirement contributions, insurance, unemployment insurance, workers’ compensation), and increments of all officers and employees, and payment to persons awarded personal service contracts;

“Receipts” includes the following:

“Nonrevenue receipts” means values accruing that either decrease an asset or create a liability;

“Operating receipts” means cash received by a budget unit for services rendered, or from the sale of materials, goods, or supplies created by the budget unit or of items held for resale; and

“Revenue receipts” means values accruing as a result of taxation or revenues, or both, and without resultant increase in liabilities or decrease in assets, whether such values are represented by cash actually received or by amounts due and payable, or partly by each;

“Revenue shortfall” means either:

An official revenue estimate for either the general fund or road fund that is less than the enacted estimates; or

Actual receipts at the end of the fiscal year for either the general fund or road fund that are less than the enacted estimates, as determined by the Office of State Budget Director;

“Surplus” means the undesignated fiscal year ending fund balance for the general fund or road fund, reduced by amounts designated to carry forward for appropriation in a subsequent fiscal year;

“Six (6) year road plan” means the road plan developed under KRS

176.430

; and

“Writing” or “written” means letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 1, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 31, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 387, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 120, § 21, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

48.020.
Continuous financial planning.

Each branch of government shall have in continuous process of preparation and revision, in the light of its direct studies of the operations, plans and needs of its budget units and of the existing and prospective sources of income, a branch budget recommendation for the next two (2) fiscal years for which a budget recommendation is required to be prepared. Upon receipt of the estimates from its budget units, each branch of government shall check these estimates in the light of its own information, and shall make such further inquiries and investigations and revise its branch budget recommendation as it deems warranted. The branch budget recommendation when approved shall be certified together with the budget statements provided for in KRS

48.110

and submitted as provided for in KRS

48.100

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 2, effective July 1, 1983.

48.025.
Tax dollars not to be used to advocate for or against public question on ballot.

Local, state, and federal tax dollars shall not be used to advocate, in partial terms, for or against any public question that appears on the ballot. For purposes of this section, “local” means and includes any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, unified local government, charter county government, or special district.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 197, § 73, effective June 29, 2021.

48.027.
Appropriations not to be used by state official or agency to challenge constitutionality — Limited exceptions — Attorney General sole named respondent in challenge to this section.

Notwithstanding any statute, administrative regulation, or common law to the contrary, and except as provided in this subsection, appropriations from the general fund, any restricted fund, the road fund, or any federal funds, whether for employee time or any other purpose, shall not be expended by an elected statewide constitutional officer, except the Attorney General, or by any other state official, employee, or agency, other than the Department of Public Advocacy in a criminal matter, to bring or support a challenge to the constitutionality of any legislative act or resolution of the General Assembly. Nothing in this section shall limit any officer, official, employee, or agency in the defense of any action brought against him or her by a party with proper standing.

If the constitutionality of subsection (1) of this section is challenged through litigation, the Attorney General shall be the sole named respondent for the Commonwealth of Kentucky in such litigation and shall consult with the Legislative Research Commission regarding defense of such litigation.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 195, § 1, effective April 13, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/13/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 195, sec. 2, provides that this statute, which was created by the Act, is retroactive to January 1, 2022.